Connecticut, session 2026, HB05299.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Administration" means the direct application or provision of a
medication by means other than injection to the body of a person;
(2) "Trained assisted living aide" means an assisted living aide who
(A) is employed by an assisted living services agency, and (B) has
successfully completed training for the administration of medication
pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section;
(3) "Assisted living services agency" has the same meaning as
provided in section 19a-490 of the general statutes;
(4) "Medication" means any medicinal preparation and includes any
controlled substances specifically designated in the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; and
(5) "Registered nurse" means a registered nurse licensed pursuant to
chapter 378 of the general statutes who (A) is employed by an assisted
living services agency, and (B) is authorized by such assisted living
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5299
services agency to delegate to a trained assisted living aide employed
by such agency the administration of medication to persons receiving
services from such assisted living services agency.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 378 of the general
statutes, a registered nurse may delegate to a trained assisted living aide
the administration of medication to persons receiving services from
such assisted living services agency.
(c) A registered nurse who, in good faith, delegates to a trained
assisted living aide the administration of medication pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be immune from civil liability for any
personal injury or financial loss resulting from the acts or omissions of
such aide in the performance of such administration of medication. Such
immunity shall not apply to any acts or omissions of the registered nurse
that are found to constitute gross negligence or wilful or wanton
misconduct. No registered nurse shall be subject to disciplinary action
by the State Board of Examiners for Nursing solely for the act of
delegating the administration of medication in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(d) The Commissioner of Public Health shall adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to carry out the
provisions of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(1), "or provision" was added; the definitions of "assisted
living aide" in Subdiv. (2) and "trained assisted living aide" in Subdiv.
(6) were consolidated in Subdiv. (2); Subdiv. (6) was deleted; and related
technical changes were made for clarity.
AGE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2